Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.180

Abatement does not preclude action for damages.

The abatement of a nuisance does not prejudice the right of any person to recover damages for its past existence.

[Code 1881 s 1240; 1875 p 79 s 6; RRS s 9918.]